Idaho, session 2026, H0756.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 3, Title 61, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 61-335, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
61-335. NEW LARGE LOADS -- RATEPAYER PROTECTION AND COST RESPONSIBIL-
ITY. (1) As used in this section:
(a) "Commission" means the Idaho public utilities commission.
(b) "Consumer" has the same meaning as provided in section 61-332A,
Idaho Code.
(c) "Cumulative power requirement" means the maximum contracted de-
mand, expressed in megawatts.
(d) "Electric service" has the same meaning as provided in section
61-332A, Idaho Code.
(e) "Electric service agreement" or "agreement" means a written con-
tract between a public utility and a new large load consumer that spec-
ifies terms of electric service, including but not limited to power re-
quirements, rates, minimum billing requirements, collateral require-
ments, contract exit fee, stranded cost recovery provisions, and con-
ditions for capacity adjustments, and that is consistent with this sec-
tion and rules of the commission.
(f) "Electric supplier" has the same meaning as provided in section
61-332A, Idaho Code.
(g)(i) "New large load" means any electric power requirement
that:
1. Is expected to reach or actually reaches a cumulative
power requirement of twenty (20) megawatts or more within
five (5) years of the initial start date for a new service
entrance; or
2. Is expected to increase or actually increases the cumu-
lative power requirement by twenty (20) megawatts or more
within five (5) years of the requested start date for the in-
crease for an existing service entrance.
(ii) An increase in the electric power requirement of an exist-
ing service entrance whose cumulative power requirement exceeded
fifty (50) megawatts as of January 1, 2000, shall not be considered
a new large load.


(h) "New service entrance" has the same meaning as provided in section
61-332A, Idaho Code.
(i) "No-harm test" means an evaluation conducted by the commission to
determine the impact a new large load will have on the rates of existing
consumers.
(j) "No rate increase" means no increase in the rates, charges, or to-
tal bill for any existing class of consumers, measured in nominal terms,
relative to the rates, charges, or total bill that would prevail absent
the new large load.
(k) "Public utility" has the same meaning as provided in section
61-332A, Idaho Code.
(l) "Service entrance" has the same meaning as provided in section
61-332A, Idaho Code.
(2) A new large load does not change its status as such by means of arti-
fice, including by splitting its load among more than one (1) electric sup-
plier or by adding additional connections, meters, or service entrances to
serve an otherwise single entity or enterprise.
(3) A public utility shall not provide electric service to a new large
load or acquire resources to serve a new large load unless the commission ap-
proves an electric service agreement for the new large load that has no rate
increase, is just and reasonable pursuant to sections 61-301 and 61-502,
Idaho Code, and complies with this section.
(4) Prior to approving a new or amended electric service agreement for
any new large load, the commission shall conduct a no-harm test to determine
whether service to the new large load may increase rates for existing con-
sumers.
(a) The no-harm test shall compare the utility's long-term revenue re-
quirement with and without the new large load and shall include, at min-
imum, consideration of the following:
(i) All incremental costs and risks associated with serving the
new large load, including but not limited to:
1. All new and existing resources required to serve the new
large load;
2. Reliability impacts;
3. Financial and operating risk, including impacts to
credit ratings, cost of equity, cost of capital, and expo-
sure to fuel and market price risk; and
4. Opportunity costs incurred to serve the new large load;
(ii) Scenario analysis addressing contract and operating risks
that may materially affect the revenue requirement; and
(iii) Any other factors the commission determines reasonably nec-
essary to ensure that service to the new large load does not in-
crease rates for existing consumers.
(b) The commission shall establish a process to ensure a consistent
methodology for applying and required inputs for the no-harm test,
which shall allow a public utility to develop energy service agreements
for new large loads that can reasonably be expected to comply with the
no-harm test.
(c) The applicant for new large load service shall reimburse the com-
mission for all costs of conducting the no-harm test.


(d) The public utility shall provide all data the commission determines
necessary to complete the no-harm test.
(e) If the commission finds, based on the no-harm test, that service to
the new large load may increase rates for existing consumers, the com-
mission shall condition approval of the electric service agreement for
the new large load on the inclusion of rates, incremental cost-recov-
ery riders, minimum monthly bills, contract-capacity charges, or other
commission-approved mechanisms that ensure no rate increase to exist-
ing consumers occurs from servicing the new large load.
(5) At least every three (3) years from the agreement's effective date,
the commission shall conduct a new no-harm test for the new large load in each
general rate case filed by the public utility to compare the prior no-harm
test's forecasted costs with the actual costs incurred to serve the new large
load.
(a) A new no-harm test shall not be required within twelve (12) months
of a prior no-harm test being completed.
(b) The new large load consumer shall reimburse the commission for all
costs of conducting the new no-harm test.
(c) If the new no-harm test indicates that the new large load has harmed
or would harm existing consumers, the commission shall require adjust-
ments to the electric service agreement to remove potential for further
harm.
(6) The electric service agreement shall include a commission-approved
exit fee structure to ensure that an exit does not result in a rate increase
to existing consumers.
(7) Any electric service agreement for a new large load shall require
the new large load to furnish financial security, in a form and amount ap-
proved by the commission, to ensure recovery of costs incurred by the public
utility in reliance on the new large load's contracted power requirement.
(a) Such security shall protect against stranded investment if the con-
tracted power requirement is not achieved.
(b) Acceptable forms of security include cash deposits, irrevocable
letters of credit, third-party guarantees, or other instruments au-
thorized by the commission. Cash deposits shall accrue interest at a
rate approved by the commission and shall be refunded in accordance with
standard financial practices upon fulfillment of contractual obliga-
tions.
(c) In approving financial security instruments, the commission shall
consider the creditworthiness of the new large load or its parent
company or affiliate or the third-party entity providing financial se-
curity, the duration and amount of the security, and the potential for
stranded investment.
(d) A new large load may request a reduction in its contracted power
requirement during the term of the electric service agreement, and the
commission may adjust the financial security required of the new large
load, subject to conditions approved by the commission.
(8) If a new large load does not achieve its contracted power require-
ment within a commission-approved ramp schedule, the commission may require
modification of rates or security to avoid cost shifts to existing con-
sumers.


(9) The commission may promulgate rules, subject to legislative ap-
proval, to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.